District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-358.04

District of Columbia Surplus Property Sales Revolving Fund.

Repealed.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 804, 58 DCR 1185
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9023, 58 DCR 6226

History